Tennessee, session 114, SB2600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-51-104(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "is entirely contained within the municipality's urban growth boundary
and".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-51-120(1), is amended by deleting
the subdivision.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-58-111(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(c) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a municipality may annex
territory in the county's planned growth area or rural area without amending a growth
plan.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-58-118, is amended by deleting the
section.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2600
010673
- 1 -